Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 24.45.161.
Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to

an individual

who lobbies without payment of compensation or other consideration and makes no disbursement or expenditure for or on behalf of a public official to influence legislative or administrative action other than to pay the individual’s reasonable personal travel and living expenses; and

who limits lobbying activities to appearances before public sessions of the legislature, or its committees or subcommittees, or to public hearings or other public proceedings of state agencies;

an elected or appointed state or municipal public officer or an employee of the state or a municipality acting in an official capacity or within the scope of employment;

any newspaper or other periodical of general circulation, book publisher, radio or television station (including an individual who owns, publishes, or is employed by that newspaper or periodical, radio or television station) that publishes news items, editorials, or other comments, or paid advertisements, that directly or indirectly urge legislative or administrative action if the newspaper, periodical, book publisher, radio or television station, or individual engages in no further or other activities in connection with urging or advocating legislative or administrative action other than to appear before public sessions of the legislature, or its committees or subcommittees, or public hearings or other public proceedings of state agencies;

a person who appears before the legislature or either house, or standing, special, or interim committee, in response to an invitation issued under (c) of this section.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed as prohibiting or affecting the rendering of professional services in drafting legislative measures or in advising clients and in rendering opinions as to the construction or effect of proposed or pending legislative or administrative action when these professional services are not otherwise connected with influencing or attempting to influence legislative or administrative action. Nor does anything in this chapter prevent members of the legislature from discussing with constituents the advisability of passing legislation then pending before, or proposed to be presented to, the legislature.

Either house of the legislature by resolution, or both houses of the legislature by concurrent resolution, may invite a person to appear to speak before the legislature or either house with reference to any pending matter. A standing, special, or interim committee of either house of the legislature may, upon the concurrence of a majority of its members, extend an invitation to any person to appear before the committee to give information in regard to, or explain, any matter pending before the committee.

An individual exempt from this chapter under (a)(1) of this section may, at the individual’s option, register and report under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)

Opinions of attorney general. —

One year prohibition on lobbying under the executive branch ethics act (AS 39.52) applies to lobbying the legislature and agencies of the executive branch. This prohibition on lobbying does not apply to a “volunteer lobbyist” or “representational lobbyist.” April 29, 2013 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 24.45.171.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“administrative action” means the proposal, drafting, development, consideration, amendment, adoption, approval, promulgation, issuance, modification, rejection, or postponement by any state agency of any rule or regulation, or any other quasi-legislative or quasi-judicial action or proceeding whether or not governed by AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act); “administrative action” does not include

a proceeding or an action to determine the rights or duties of a person under existing statutes, regulations, or policies;

the issuance, amendment, or revocation of a permit, license, or entitlement for use under existing statutes, regulations, or policies by the agency authorized to issue, amend, or revoke the permit, license, or entitlement for use;

the enforcement of compliance with existing law or the imposition of sanctions for a violation of existing law;

procurement activity, including the purchase or sale of property, goods, or services by the agency or the award of a grant contract;

the issuance of, or ensuring compliance with, an opinion or activity related to a collective bargaining agreement including negotiating or enforcing the agreement;

“agency” means a state department, division, commission, board, office, bureau, institution, corporation, authority, organization, committee, council or board in the executive branch, or independent of the executive branch, of state government;

“commission” means the Alaska Public Offices Commission;

“communicate directly” means to speak with a legislator, legislative employee, or public official

by telephone;

by two-way electronic communication; or

in person;

“domestic partner” has the meaning given in AS

39.50.200(a)

;

“gift”

means any payment to the extent that consideration of equal or greater value is not received;

includes but is not limited to

a loan, loan guarantee, forgiveness of a loan, payment of a loan by a third party, or an enforceable promise to make a payment except when full and adequate consideration is received;

the purchase of tickets for travel or for entertainment events; and

the granting of discounts or rebates for goods or services not extended to the public generally;

does not include

informational or promotional materials, including but not limited to books, reports, pamphlets, calendars, or periodicals; however, payments for travel or reimbursement for expenses may not be considered “informational material”;

food and beverages consumed in places of public accommodation;

“immediate family” means the spouse and dependent children of an individual;

“individual” means a natural person;

“influencing legislative or administrative action” means to communicate directly for the purpose of introducing, promoting, advocating, supporting, modifying, opposing, or delaying or seeking to do the same with respect to any legislative or administrative action;

“legislative action” means the preparation, research, drafting, introduction, consideration, modification, amendment, approval, passage, enactment, defeat, or rejection of any bill, resolution, amendment, motion, report, nomination, appointment, or other matter by the legislature, or by a standing, interim, or special committee of the legislature, or by a member or employee of the legislature acting in an official capacity; it includes, but is not limited to, the action of the governor in approving or vetoing a bill or the action of the legislature in considering, overriding, or sustaining that veto and the action of the legislature in considering, confirming, or rejecting an executive appointment of the governor;

“lobbyist” means a person who

is employed and receives payments, or who contracts for economic consideration, including reimbursement for reasonable travel and living expenses, to communicate directly or through the person’s agents with any public official for the purpose of influencing legislation or administrative action for more than 10 hours in any 30-day period in one calendar year; or

represents oneself as engaging in the influencing of legislative or administrative action as a business, occupation, or profession;

“payment” means the disbursement, distribution, transfer, loan, advance, deposit, gift, or other rendering or tendering of money, property, goods, or services or anything else of value;

“payment to influence legislative or administrative action” means any of the following:

a direct or indirect payment to a lobbyist whether for salary, fee, compensation for expenses, or any other purpose, by a person employing, retaining, or contracting for the services of the lobbyist separately or jointly with other persons;

a payment in support of or assistance to a lobbyist or the lobbyist’s activities, including but not limited to the direct payment of expenses incurred at the request or suggestion of the lobbyist;

a payment that directly benefits a public official or a member of the immediate family of that official;

a payment, including compensation, payment, or reimbursement for the services, time, or expenses of an employee for or in connection with direct communication with a public official;

a payment for or in connection with soliciting or urging other persons to enter into direct communication with a public official;

a payment or reimbursement for expenses in the categories set out in AS

24.45.051(a)(2)

;

“person”, in addition to the terms set out in AS

01.10.060

includes a labor union; and

“public official” or “public officer” means a public official as defined in AS

39.50.200(a)

, a member of the legislature, or a legislative director as defined in AS

24.60.990(a)

; however, it does not include a judicial officer or an elected or appointed municipal officer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976; am § 39 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 39 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 26 ch 108 SLA 2003; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 115 SLA 2003; am § 4, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure 1; am § 17 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (3) and (4) were enacted as paragraph (13) and renumbered in 2003, at which time paragraphs (3) — (12) were renumbered as (5) — (14). Paragraph (5) was enacted as paragraph (15) and renumbered in 2007, at which time paragraphs (5) — (14) were renumbered as (6) — (15).

Administrative Code. —

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 24.45.181.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Regulation of Lobbying Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)